Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5589.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1136a. (1) The governing body of a public school shall implement a policy that prohibits school personnel from requiring pupils to use a social media platform as part of a school-related activity. (2) As used in this section: (a) "School-related activity" means any activity or requirement imposed on a pupil as part of a classroom lesson or extracurricular activity, including, but not limited to, a school club or interscholastic athletics. (b) "Social media platform" means a public-facing website, online service, online application, or mobile application that is directed to consumers, collects personal data, primarily derives revenue from advertising or the sale of personal data, and as its primary function provides a community forum for user-generated content, including messages, videos, and audio files among users where such content is primarily intended for viewing, resharing, or platform-enabled distributed social endorsement or comment. Social media platform does not include a platform that, as its primary function for consumers, provides or facilitates any of the following: (i) The purchase and sale of commercial goods. (ii) Teleconferencing or videoconferencing services that allow reception and transmission of audio or video signals for real-time communication, provided that the real-time communication is initiated by using a unique link or identifier to facilitate access. (iii) Crowd-sourced reference guides such as encyclopedias and dictionaries. (iv) Cloud storage, file sharing, or file collaboration services, including such services that allow collaborative editing by invited users. (v) The playing or creation of video games. (vi) Content that consists primarily of news, sports, sports coverage, entertainment, or other information or content that is not user-generated but is preselected by the platform and for which any chat, comment, or interactive functionality is incidental, directly related to, or dependent on the provision of the content provided by the platform. (vii) Business, product, or travel information including user reviews or rankings of such businesses, products, or other travel information. (viii) Educational information, experiences, training, or instruction provided to build knowledge, skills, or a craft, district-sanctioned or school-sanctioned learning management systems and school information systems for the purposes of schools conveying content related to the education of pupils, or services on behalf of or in support of a public school. (ix) An email service. (x) A wireless messaging service, including such a service provided through short message service or multimedia messaging protocols, that is not a component of, or linked to, a social media platform and where the predominant or exclusive function of the messaging service is direct messaging consisting of the transmission of text, photos, or videos that are sent by electronic means, where messages are transmitted from the sender to the recipient and are not posted publicly or within a social media platform. (xi) A broadband internet access service under 47 CFR 8.1. (xii) A virtual private network or similar service that exists solely to route internet traffic between locations.